Hawaii statutes.
[§425R-4] Appointment of registered agent.
(a) An entity's or other person's registered agent filing, as defined by this
chapter, shall state:

(1) The name of the represented entity's commercial
registered agent; or

(2) If the entity does not have a commercial
registered agent:

(A) The name of the individual or the name,
type, and jurisdiction of organization of the entity's noncommercial registered
agent and the address of a place of business of the person in this State to
which service of process and other notice and documents being served on or sent
to the entity represented by it may be delivered; or

(B) The title of an office or other position
with the entity if service of process is to be sent to the person holding that
office or position, and the address of the business office in the State of that
person; provided that the office or other position stated in the filing shall
comport with the requirements of sections 414-64, 414D-74, 415A-27, 425-21,
425E-117, and 428-110.

(b) The appointment of a registered agent
pursuant to subsection (a)(1) or [(a)(2)(A)] is an affirmation by the
represented entity that the agent has consented to serve as such. [L 2009, c
55, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next